Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.76.090

Office created—Purpose.

(1) The office of student financial assistance is created within and under the direction of the student achievement council.

(2) The purpose of the office is to administer state and federal financial aid and other education services programs, including the advanced college tuition payment program in chapter 28B.95 RCW, in a cost-effective manner.

[ 2012 c 229 s 401; 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 102; 2007 c 458 s 102; 2004 c 275 s 4; 1987 c 330 s 301; 1985 c 370 s 14. Formerly RCW 28B.80.430.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Construction—Application of rules—Severability—1987 c 330: See notes following RCW 28B.12.050.